ja: 導電性ジェル用途: 除細動; ECGモニタリング; EEGモニタリング; EKGモニタリング; EMGモニタリング; EMS療法; 胎児モニタリング（CTG）; IPL施術; イオントフォレシス; レーザー施術; TENS療法; 超音波イメージング; その他
fr: Application du gel conducteur: Défibrillation; Surveillance ECG; Surveillance EEG; Surveillance EKG; Surveillance EMG; Thérapie EMS; Surveillance fœtale (CTG); Procédures IPL; Iontophorèse; Procédures laser; Thérapie TENS; Imagerie par ultrasons; Autre
zh-TW: 傳導凝膠應用: 除顫; ECG 監測; 腦電圖監測; 心電圖監測; 肌電圖監測; 肌肉電刺激治療; 胎心監護（CTG）; 強脈衝光程序; 離子電滲透; 雷射程序; 經皮神經電刺激治療; 超音波成像; 其他
vi: Ứng dụng gel dẫn điện: Khử rung tim; Thiết bị theo dõi chỉ số điện tim; Theo dõi EEG; Theo dõi EKG; Theo dõi EMG; Trị liệu EMS; Theo dõi thai nhi (CTG); Thủ thuật IPL; Điện di ion; Thủ thuật laser; Trị liệu TENS; Chụp siêu âm; Khác
pt-PT: Aplicação de gel de condutividade: Desfibrilação; Monitorização de ECG; Monitorização EEG; Monitorização EKG; Monitorização EMG; Terapia EMS; Monitorização fetal (CTG); Procedimentos IPL; Iontoforese; Procedimentos laser; Terapia TENS; Imagem de ultrassom; Outro
es: Aplicación de gel de conductividad: Desfibrilación; Monitoreo de ECG; Monitoreo EEG; Monitoreo EKG; Monitoreo EMG; Terapia EMS; Monitoreo fetal (CTG); Procedimientos IPL; Iontoforesis; Procedimientos láser; Terapia TENS; Imagen de ultrasonido; Otros
nl: Toepassing geleidbaarheidsgel: Defibrillatie; ECG-bewaking; EEG monitoring; EKG monitoring; EMG monitoring; EMS therapie; Foetale monitoring (CTG); IPL procedures; Iontoforese; Laser procedures; TENS therapie; Echografie; Andere
sv: Ledningsgeltillämpning: Defibrillering; EKG-monitorer; EEG-övervakning; EKG-övervakning; EMG-övervakning; EMS-terapi; Fosterövervakning (CTG); IPL-behandlingar; Jontofores; Laserbehandlingar; TENS-terapi; Ultraljudsavbildning; Övrigt
bg-BG: Приложение на контактен гел: Дефибрилация; ЕКГ мониторинг; ЕЕГ мониторинг; ЕКГ мониторинг; ЕМГ мониторинг; ЕМС терапия; Фетален мониторинг (КТГ); IPL процедури; Йонтофореза; Лазерни процедури; ТЕНС терапия; Ултразвуково изобразяване; Други
fi: Johtavuusgeelin käyttö: Defibrillaatio; EKG-valvonta; EEG-seuranta; EKG-seuranta; EMG-seuranta; EMS-hoito; Sikiöseuranta (CTG); IPL-toimenpiteet; Iontoforeesi; Lasertoimenpiteet; TENS-hoito; Ultraäänikuvaus; Muu
sl-SI: Uporaba prevodnega gela: Defibrilacija; spremljanje EKG; EEG monitoring; EKG monitoring; EMG monitoring; EMS terapija; Monitoring ploda (CTG); IPL postopki; Iontoforeza; Laserski postopki; TENS terapija; Ultrazvočno slikanje; Drugo
hr-HR: Primjena gela za vodljivost: Defibrilacija; EKG praćenje; EEG praćenje; EKG praćenje; EMG praćenje; EMS terapija; Fetalno praćenje (CTG); IPL postupci; Iontoforeza; Laserski postupci; TENS terapija; Ultrazvučno snimanje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Aplicare gel conductiv: Defibrilare; Monitorizare EKG; Monitorizare EEG; Monitorizare EKG; Monitorizare EMG; Terapie EMS; Monitorizare fetală (CTG); Proceduri IPL; Iontoforeză; Proceduri laser; Terapie TENS; Imagistică cu ultrasunete; Altele
zh-CN: 导电凝胶应用: 除颤; 心电图监测; 脑电图监测; 心电监测; 肌电图监测; 肌肉电刺激治疗; 胎儿监护 (CTG); 强脉冲光程序; 离子电渗疗法; 激光程序; 经皮神经电刺激治疗; 超声成像; 其他
ko: 전도성 젤 적용: 제세동; ECG 모니터링; EEG 모니터링; EKG 모니터링; EMG 모니터링; EMS 치료; 태아 모니터링 (CTG); IPL 시술; 이온삼투법; 레이저 시술; TENS 치료; 초음파 영상; 기타
tr: İletkenlik jeli uygulaması: Defibrilasyon; EKG izleme; EEG izleme; EKG izleme; EMG izleme; EMS terapisi; Fetal izleme (CTG); IPL işlemleri; İyontoforez; Lazer işlemleri; TENS terapisi; Ultrason görüntüleme; Diğer
hu: Vezetőgél alkalmazása: Defibrilláció; EKG-figyelés; EEG monitorozás; EKG monitorozás; EMG monitorozás; EMS terápia; Magzati monitorozás (CTG); IPL eljárások; Iontoforézis; Lézeres eljárások; TENS terápia; Ultrahang képalkotás; Egyéb
el: Εφαρμογή αγώγιμου τζελ: Απινίδωση; Παρακολούθησης θέματος; Παρακολούθηση ΗΕΓ; Παρακολούθηση ΗΚΓ; Παρακολούθηση ΗΜΓ; Θεραπεία EMS; Εμβρυϊκή παρακολούθηση (CTG); Διαδικασίες IPL; Ιοντοφόρηση; Διαδικασίες λέιζερ; Θεραπεία TENS; Υπερηχογραφική απεικόνιση; Άλλο
da: Anvendelse af ledningsevne-gel: Defibrillering; EKG-overvågning; EEG-overvågning; EKG-overvågning; EMG-overvågning; EMS-terapi; Fosterovervågning (CTG); IPL-procedurer; Iontoforese; Laserprocedurer; TENS-terapi; Ultralydsbilleddannelse; Andet
pt-BR: Aplicação de gel de condutividade: Desfibrilação; Monitoramento de ECG; Monitoramento de EEG; Monitoramento de EKG; Monitoramento de EMG; Terapia EMS; Monitoramento fetal (CTG); Procedimentos de IPL; Iontoforese; Procedimentos a laser; Terapia TENS; Ultrassonografia; Outro
th: การใช้งานเจลนำไฟฟ้า: การกระตุ้นหัวใจ; การตรวจสอบคลื่น ECG; การติดตามอีอีจี; การติดตามอีเคจี; การติดตามอีเอ็มจี; การบำบัดด้วยอีเอ็มเอส; การติดตามทารกในครรภ์ (ซีทีจี); การทำไอพีแอล; ไอออนโตโฟรีซิส; การทำเลเซอร์; การบำบัดด้วยเทนส์; การทำอัลตราซาวนด์; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Aplikácia vodivého gélu: Defibrilácia; Monitorovanie EKG; EEG monitorovanie; EKG monitorovanie; EMG monitorovanie; EMS terapia; Fetálne monitorovanie (CTG); IPL procedúry; Iontoforéza; Laserové procedúry; TENS terapia; Ultrazvukové zobrazovanie; Iné
pl: Zastosowanie żelu przewodzącego: Defibrylacja; Monitorowanie EKG; Monitorowanie EEG; Monitorowanie EKG; Monitorowanie EMG; Terapia EMS; Monitorowanie płodu (CTG); Zabiegi IPL; Jonoforeza; Zabiegi laserowe; Terapia TENS; Obrazowanie ultrasonograficzne; Inne
nb: Ledningsevne gel anvendelse: Defibrillering; ECG-overvåkning; EEG-overvåking; EKG-overvåking; EMG-overvåking; EMS-terapi; Fosterovervåking (CTG); IPL-prosedyrer; Iontoforese; Laserprosedyrer; TENS-terapi; Ultralydavbildning; Annet
cs: Aplikace vodivého gelu: Defibrilace; Monitorování EKG; Monitorování EEG; Monitorování EKG; Monitorování EMG; EMS terapie; Fetální monitorování (CTG); IPL procedury; Iontoforéza; Laserové procedury; TENS terapie; Ultrazvukové zobrazování; Jiné
ru: Применение проводящего геля: Дефибрилляция; Мониторинг ЭКГ; ЭЭГ-мониторинг; ЭКГ-мониторинг; ЭМГ-мониторинг; ЭМС-терапия; Фетальный мониторинг (КТГ); IPL-процедуры; Ионофорез; Лазерные процедуры; ЧЭНС-терапия; Ультразвуковая визуализация; Другой
de: Leitfähigkeitsgel-Anwendung: Defibrillation; EKG-Monitoring; EEG-Überwachung; EKG-Überwachung; EMG-Überwachung; EMS-Therapie; Fetale Überwachung (CTG); IPL-Verfahren; Iontophorese; Laserverfahren; TENS-Therapie; Ultraschallbildgebung; Sonstiges
it: Applicazione del gel conduttivo: Defibrillazione; Monitor con ECG; Monitoraggio EEG; Monitoraggio EKG; Monitoraggio EMG; Terapia EMS; Monitoraggio fetale (CTG); Procedure IPL; Iontoforesi; Procedure laser; Terapia TENS; Imaging ecografico; Altro
lt-LT: Laidumo gelio pritaikymas: Defibriliacija; EKG matavimas; EEG stebėjimas; EKG stebėjimas; EMG stebėjimas; EMS terapija; Vaisiaus stebėjimas (CTG); IPL procedūros; Jontoforezė; Lazerio procedūros; TENS terapija; Ultragarso tyrimai; Kita
en: Conductivity gel application: Defibrillation; ECG monitoring; EEG monitoring; EKG monitoring; EMG monitoring; EMS therapy; Fetal monitoring (CTG); IPL procedures; Iontophoresis; Laser procedures; TENS therapy; Ultrasound imaging; Other